Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.360

Foreign registration statement—Filing.

A foreign corporation may register to conduct affairs in this state by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a foreign registration statement in accordance with RCW 23.95.510.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4120; 1989 c 307 s 38; 1982 c 45 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 72.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.

Application—1989 c 307: See RCW 23.86.900.